Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-9209
Exemption from examination.

(1) An individual who moves to this state, was previously licensed as a public adjuster in another state based on a public adjuster examination, and applies for a resident public adjuster license in this state within ninety days of establishing legal residence shall not be required to pass an examination pursuant to section 44-9208 in this state if:

(a) Such individual is currently licensed in the other state or if an application for a resident public adjuster license is received within twelve months of the cancellation of his or her previous license; and

(b) The other state issues a certification that such individual is licensed and in good standing in that state or was licensed and in good standing at the time of cancellation.

(2) An individual who applies for a resident public adjuster license and who was previously licensed as either a resident public adjuster or a nonresident public adjuster in this state shall not be required to complete an examination if the application is received within twelve months of the termination of such previous license in this state and if, at the time of such termination, the applicant was in good standing in this state.

Laws 2018, LB743, § 9.